Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-701 of Title 14A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. “Assessment fee” means a fee paid to the payment card
network for allowing a merchant to use a payment card or other
payment code or device in a credit card transaction;
2. “Cardholder” means the person named on the face of a credit
card to whom or for whose benefit the credit card is issued;
3. “Credit card” means a card or device issued under an
agreement by which the credit card issuer gives to a cardholder the
right to obtain credit from the issuer or another person;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2102 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. “Credit card issuer” means a lender, including a financial
institution or a merchant that receives applications and issues
credit cards to individuals;
5. “Credit card transaction” means a transaction in which a
person uses a credit card or other payment code or device issued or
approved through a payment card network to use a line of credit,
whether authorization is based on a signature, personal
identification number, or other means;
6. “Fee schedule” means any schedule, list, table, chart, or
similar document or agreement that sets forth or fixes the amount or
the formula for determining the amount of fee rates;
7. “Interchange fee” means a fee charged to a merchant for the
purpose of compensating the credit card issuer for the issuer’s
involvement in a credit card transaction;
8. “Merchant” means a person who accepts payment for goods or
services through a credit card transaction;
9. “Payment card network” means an entity that directly or
through a licensed member, processor, or agent provides the
proprietary services, infrastructure, and software that:
a. routes information and data to conduct a credit card
transaction authorization, clearance, and settlement,
and


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2102 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. the entity uses to accept as a form of payment, a
brand of credit card or other device that may be used
to carry out credit card transactions; and
10. “Swipe fee” means the interchange fee and, if applicable,
the assessment fee.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-702 of Title 14A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A credit card issuer that, together with any affiliates, has
consolidated worldwide banking and nonbanking assets, including
affiliate assets, other than trust assets under management, of more
than Eighty-five Billion Dollars ($85,000,000,000.00) at any point
during the previous calendar year shall not:
1. Fix or conspire to fix a swipe fee with or on behalf of
another credit card issuer or payment card network;
2. Receive or charge an interchange fee with respect to a
credit card transaction in an amount that is included on or
determined by a fee schedule that:
a. has been fixed, established, or recommended by a
payment card network, or
b. the credit card issuer knows, or reasonably should
know, is being used in the same calendar year by
another credit card issuer to determine the amount of

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2102 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

an interchange fee with respect to a credit card
transaction that such issuer receives or charges;
3. Charge a cardholder or a merchant a fee due to a disputed
credit card transaction unless a finding of fact concludes that the
cardholder or merchant is responsible for the disputed transaction
and the cardholder or merchant is provided written notification of
the finding of fact; or
4. Prohibit or penalize a merchant that offers a cardholder a
discount for using cash, a debit card, or a gift card instead of a
credit card for payment.
B. A credit card issuer shall disclose in a clear and
conspicuous manner on a monthly statement sent to a cardholder that
has been issued a credit card by the credit card issuer the amount
of the swipe fee charged to the cardholder on a credit card
transaction if one or more swipe fees have been charged to the
cardholder on a credit card transaction.
C. A payment card network shall not:
1. Fix or conspire to fix a swipe fee with or on behalf of
another credit card issuer or payment card network;
2. Require a merchant to accept as payment any credit card
issued by the credit card issuer;
3. Charge a cardholder or a merchant a fee due to disputed
credit card transactions unless a finding of fact concludes that the
cardholder or merchant is responsible for the disputed credit card
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2102 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

tran saction and the cardholder or merchant is provided written
notification of the finding of fact; or
4. Prohibit or penalize a merchant that offers a cardholder a
discount for using cash, a debit card, or a gift card instead of a
credit card for payment.
D. A payment card network shall disclose not less than forty-
five (45) days after the date of the credit card transaction, in a
clear and conspicuous manner to the merchant or another person who
assists the merchant in processing credit card transactions and who
has been designated by the merchant to receive the disclosures, the
rate and total amount of each swipe fee or other fee charged on each
credit card transaction.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-703 of Title 14A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Attorney General may promulgate rules necessary for the
enforcement of this act.
B. The Attorney General may investigate any violation of this
act and may impose fines not to exceed:
1. Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) for an
individual;
2. Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) for an entity, if the
lesser of the entity’s assets or market capitalization is less than
Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00);
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2102 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) for an entity, if
the lesser of the entity’s assets or market capitalization is at
least One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) but less than
Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00); or
4. Thirty Million Dollars ($30,000,000.00) for an entity, if
the lesser of the entity’s assets or market capitalization is Five
Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00) or more.
C. The Attorney General may file an action in a court of
competent jurisdiction against any person in a judicial district in
which any of the named defendants resides, does business, or
maintains its principal place of business on behalf of this state to
enjoin temporarily or permanently any activity or contemplated
activity that violates or threatens to violate this act.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
March 5, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED









SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2102 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)